California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The planning commission of such county shall thereafter prepare a precise plan showing such planned right-of-way in conformity with Section 65600 of the Government Code, and the board of supervisors shall thereafter adopt such precise plan in the manner provided in Article 11 (commencing with Section 65600), Chapter 3, Title 7 of the Government Code.

Thereafter, the planning commission shall also notify the department of any application for a building permit for a building costing five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more in sufficient time to give the department an opportunity to purchase the right-of-way from such applicant. Upon adoption of a resolution by the board of supervisors, the notice to the department may be given by any other officer, board, commission, or department designated for that purpose by the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1245.)
-------------------------------------------

740.5.

The department shall transmit a copy of such map, insofar as it relates to the land within a city, to the planning commission of the city or, if the city has not created a planning commission, to the governing body of the city.

The planning commission of such city or, if the city has not created a planning commission, the governing body of such city acting as a planning commission, shall thereafter notify the department of any application for a building permit for a building costing five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more in sufficient time to give the department an opportunity to purchase the right-of-way from such applicant.

The notices required to be given by the planning commission, or by the governing body acting as a planning commission, may be given by any other officer, board, commission, or department designated for that purpose by resolution of the governing body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1245.)
-------------------------------------------

740.6.

A copy of the precised plan shall be filed with the agency of the county charged with the duty of issuing building permits for buildings in unincorporated areas in the county, or, if no such agency exists in the county, with the county surveyor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

740.8.

No person shall hereafter erect any building or structure, other than a temporary structure costing less than five hundred dollars ($500) without a permit to do so. If no other agency is charged with the duty of issuing such permits the county surveyor shall have such duty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

741.

Prior to issuing a building permit the officer whose function is to issue such permits shall examine the precised plan and if he finds that the building or structure proposed to be erected will lie within the boundaries of the mapped highway he shall grant the permit if the cost of the proposed building or structure is five hundred dollars ($500) or less. Otherwise he shall refuse such permit and notify the applicant for the permit of the reason for such refusal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

741.2.

Any person aggrieved by the refusal of a building permit under this article may request a hearing on the matter by an appeals board. Except as hereinafter provided the governing body of the county is the appeals board for the county. If the governing body of any county determines that the number of hearings requested is so numerous that they cannot be handled expeditiously by such body, it shall appoint an appeals board to conduct such hearings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

741.4.

The appeals board shall grant the permit if any of the following are true:

(a) That the property of which the mapped highway location is a part is of such nature that the owner of the land will be substantially damaged by the refusal to grant the permit.

(b) That the property will not earn a fair return on the owner’s investment unless the construction involved is authorized.

(c) That, balancing the interests of the public in preserving the integrity of the officially mapped highway against the interest of the owner of the land in using his property, the granting of the permit is required by considerations of justice and equity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

741.6.

The appeals board shall not grant the permit if any of the following are true:

(a) That the owner of the land will not be substantially damaged by locating the proposed structure on his land outside of the lines of the mapped highway.

(b) That, balancing the interests of the public in preserving the integrity of the mapped highway against the interest of the land owner in using his property as proposed to be used, the resulting disadvantages to the State would be unreasonably disproportionate to the advantages to the owner to be derived from so using the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

741.7.

Nothing in this article shall be deemed a condition precedent to the acquisition of rights of way by purchase or by proceedings in eminent domain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

741.8.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to restrict the right of any person to seek declaratory relief pursuant to Section 1060 of the Code of Civil Procedure or to avail himself of any other legal or equitable remedy applicable to his particular case.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

741.9.

The assessor, in assessing any property affected by the provisions of this article, shall take into consideration any impairment of the use of the property which lessens its actual value resulting from the establishment of the location of the highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

742.

If any provision of this article, or the application thereof to any person, or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this article, and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Control of Junkyards, Scrap Metal Processing Facilities, and Automobile Dismantling Facilities [745. - 759.3.]

745.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(a) The establishment, use, and maintenance of junkyards in areas adjacent to any interstate or primary highway should be controlled in order to promote the safety and recreational value of public travel, to protect the public investment in such highways, and to preserve the natural beauty of areas adjacent to such highways. The Legislature finds that motorists are distracted by unscreened junkyards adjacent to such highways and that a junkyard visible from such a highway constitutes a hazard to the safety of the traveling public.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, by the enactment of this article, to provide for the state control of junkyards required by Section 136 of Title 23 of th United States Code.

(c) The recycling industry plays an important role in the conservation of our state resources. In support of that role, should removal of junk or scrap from a nonconforming junkyard be necessary because such junk or scrap is visible from any interstate or primary highway, then the department may either purchase such junk or scrap and move it to a recycling center or pay the costs of moving the junk or scrap to a recycling center, whichever is less expensive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

746.

As used in this article:

(a) “Junk” means old or scrap copper, brass, rope, rags, batteries, paper, trash, rubber debris, waste, junked, dismantled or wrecked motor vehicles, or parts thereof, iron, steel and other old or scrap ferrous or nonferrous material. 

(b) “Automobile graveyard” means any establishment or place of business which is maintained, used, or operated for storing, keeping, buying, or selling wrecked, scrapped, ruined, or dismantled motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts.

(c) “Junkyard” means any establishment or place of business which is maintained, operated, or used for storing, keeping, buying, or selling junk, or for the maintenance or operation of an automobile graveyard. This definition includes scrap metal processors, autowrecking yards, salvage yards, scrap yards, auto recycling yards, used auto parts yards, and temporary storage of automobile bodies and parts awaiting disposal as a normal part of a business operation when the business will continually have like materials located on the premises. The definition also includes garbage dumps and sanitary landfills. The definition does not include litter, trash, and other debris scattered along or upon the highway, or temporary operations and outdoor storage of limited duration.

(d) “Scrap metal processing facility” means any establishment or place of business which is maintained, used, or operated solely for the processing and preparing of scrap metals for remelting by steel mills and foundries.

(e) “Automobile dismantling facility” means any establishment or place of business which is maintained, used, or operated by an “automobile dismantler,” as defined in the Vehicle Code, for the buying, selling, or dealing in vehicles of a type required to be registered under the Vehicle Code for the purpose of dismantling such vehicles and for the buying or selling of the integral parts and component materials of such vehicles.

(f) “Special conditions” are any of the following which have occurred after October 6, 1966: (1) physical changes which occur within a state-owned right-of-way which cause a junkyard to become visible, such as the failure to maintain screening within the right-of-way or the reconstruction of the highway, (2) the classification of a highway as interstate or primary, or (3) redesignation of an industrial zone to some other zoning classification.

(g) “Visible” means capable of being seen without visual aid by a person of normal visual acuity while driving on the main traveled way of an interstate or primary highway.

(h) “Interstate highway” means any highway at any time officially designated as a part of the national system of interstate and defense highways by appropriate authority of the federal government.

(i) “Primary highway” means any highway, other than an interstate highway, at any time officially designated as a part of the federal-aid primary system by appropriate authority of the federal government.

(j) “Recycle” means either:

(1) Purchasing junk and moving it to an automobile wrecker or scrap processor, or putting it to some other useful purpose, or

(2) Paying the costs of moving such junk to an automobile wrecker or scrap processor or to a place where it will be put to some useful purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

746.1.

“Nonconforming junkyard” means either of the following:

(a) A junkyard lawfully in existence on October 6, 1966, but which does not conform to the requirements of this article.

(b) A junkyard which is lawfully in existence at any time but later fails to comply with the requirements of this article due to special conditions as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 746.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

746.2.

Nonconforming junkyards may continue in existence as long as they are not extended, enlarged, or changed in use, and are otherwise lawfully maintained.

If the location of a nonconforming junkyard is changed for any reason, it ceases to be nonconforming and shall be treated as a new junkyard at a new location.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

746.3.

An illegal junkyard is one which is either:

(a) Established or is maintained in violation of this article and does not come within the definition of a “nonconforming junkyard,” as defined in Section 746.1.

(b) A junkyard which becomes visible due to inadequate maintenance of screening located off the highway right-of-way, or the placement of junk so that it may be seen above or beyond the screen, or otherwise becomes visible.

(c) A junkyard which, due to any conditions other than those described in subdivision (f) of Section 746, is established or maintained in violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

747.

Except as hereafter provided, no junkyard shall be established, operated, or maintained if any portion of the junkyard is within 1,000 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way and visible from the main traveled way of any interstate or primary highway and is not located in an area zoned for industrial purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

747.1.

Sanitary landfills need not be screened to satisfy the requirements of this article but landscaping shall be required when the fill has been completed and operations have ceased, unless the landfill area is to be used for immediate development purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

748.

(a) Any nonconforming junkyard, as soon as the maximum federal share under Section 136 of Title 23, United States Code, is available for that purpose, shall be removed from sight of interstate or primary highways by any of the following methods to whatever extent is required, so as not to be visible from the main traveled way of any interstate or primary highway:

(1) Screening by natural objects, plantings, fences, or other appropriate means.

(2) Recycling, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 746.

(3) Relocation.

(b) This section applies if any portion of such junkyard is within 1,000 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way and if it is visible from the main traveled way of such highway. The department shall screen such junkyards at locations on the highway right-of-way or in areas acquired for such purpose adjacent to the right-of-way or may compensate the junkyard owner for the placement of screening on the junkyard property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

749.

The department may also screen any junkyards located within 1,000 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway and located within an industrial zone if the director finds that such screening is necessary or desirable to achieve the purposes set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 745.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

751.

The department is authorized to acquire such interests in real and personal property as may be necessary to effect the screening, recycling, relocation, removal, or disposal of junkyards required by the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

751.1.

The Legislature hereby declares that the acquisition of interests in real and personal property to effect the screening, relocation, removal, or disposal of junkyards provided for in Section 751 constitutes a public use and purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

752.

If federal law should be interpreted as requiring the states to pay just compensation with regard to the relocation, removal, or disposal of junkyards, just compensation shall be paid by the department to the owners of nonconforming junkyards which must be relocated, removed, or disposed of pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

753.

The commission is authorized to allocate funds from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund for all of the following purposes:

(a) Costs of administering the provisions of this article.

(b) Costs of maintaining only that screening which is located on state right-of-way.

(c) Costs necessary to match the maximum contribution allowed by the federal government in carrying out the purposes of this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

754.

Any junkyard which is established or maintained in violation of the provisions of this article or the regulations prescribed thereunder is a public nuisance and may be removed or otherwise disposed of by any public employee or entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

755.

The director may screen, relocate, remove or dispose of any illegal junkyard after 30 days’ written notice posted on such property and a copy forwarded by mail to the owner of such junkyard at his last-known address. The department shall have an action to recover the expense of such screening, relocating, removing or disposing, costs and expenses of suit, and, in addition thereto, the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day such junkyard or portion thereof, remains in violation after the expiration of 30 days from the time of forwarding such written notice.

For the purposes of this section, the director or his authorized agent may enter upon private property.

All costs incurred under this section in screening, relocating, removing or disposing of such junkyards shall be the responsibility of the owners thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

756.

Every illegal junkyard is a public nuisance and every person, as principal, agent or employee, violating any of the provisions of this article or the regulations prescribed thereunder is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

757.

The remedies provided in this article for the removal of junkyards are cumulative and not exclusive of any other remedies provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

758.

The director may enter into agreements with the Secretary of Transportation of the United States and accept any allotment of funds as provided by Section 136 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 990.)
-------------------------------------------

759.

The director shall prescribe and enforce regulations governing the establishment, screening, relocation, removal, or disposal of junkyards as provided in this article consistent with the provisions of Section 136 of Title 23 of the United States Code and the national standards promulgated thereunder by the Secretary of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

759.3.

It is declared to be the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to establish minimum standards with respect to the regulation of outdoor junkyards. The governing body of any city, county, or city and county may enact ordinances, including, but not limited to, land use or zoning ordinances, imposing restrictions on junkyards equal to or greater than those imposed by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Cooperation By and With the State [760. - 834.]



  ARTICLE 1. County Aid to State [760. - 762.]

760.

(a) If the board of supervisors of any county determines, by a four-fifths vote of the membership of the board, that the acquisition or contribution authorized under this section will promote the interests of the county and the acquisition or contribution is recommended in writing by the department, the board, by resolution passed by a four-fifths vote of its members, may proceed to do either or both of the following:

(1) Acquire any real property or interest needed for state highway purposes and described in the department’s written recommendation. The board shall proceed, if necessary, to condemn the real property or any interest therein. The title to the property or interest may be taken in the name of the state or the county. The resolution of the board is the only preliminary procedure required prior to the acquisition of the property or interest, or to the commencement of a condemnation proceeding, except that if the acquisition is by eminent domain, the resolution shall be one that satisfies the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1245.210) of Chapter 4 of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) Contribute bridges, fencing, money, labor, materials, and appurtenances toward the construction of state highways within the limits of the county.

(b) After the board has adopted the resolution described in subdivision (a) and based on the terms of that resolution, the department may proceed to condemn any real property or interest that is described in both the department’s recommendation and the board’s resolution.

(c) The acquisitions or contributions authorized under this section shall be for the use of the state as provided in Section 762.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 546, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

761.

The expense of any such acquisition of real property or interest therein, or of any such contribution, or of both, may be charged to the general fund of the county, the road fund of the county, or the district fund of the district benefited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------

762.

The State may receive and use the benefits provided under section 760, and any money contributed by a county under that section shall be paid into a State fund available for highway purposes and designated by the board of supervisors in the resolution determining such contribution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cooperative Highway Construction and Improvement [790. - 798.]

790.

The board of supervisors of any county may, by a vote of not less than three-fifths of its membership, petition the department to cooperate, under the provisions of this article, in the improvement of an existent highway or the construction of a proposed highway in that county when such existent highway connects, or such proposed highway will connect, a forest highway system road or national park road which is already built or under construction, with any State highway. Such connecting highway shall not exceed fifty miles in length.

When any highway sought to be improved or constructed under the provisions of this article is situated in two or more counties, a petition, or concurrence in such a petition, passed by a three-fifths vote of the membership of the board of supervisors of each of such counties is required to initiate the proceeding under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

791.

Such petition shall contain:

(a) A description of the highway proposed to be improved or constructed.

(b) A statement as to whether the county will supply, at its own expense, such rights of way as are necessary.

(c) A statement of the funds which such county already has available, or proposes to provide, for such construction.

(d) Such other information or data as the department requests.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

792.

Upon the receipt of such petition, if the department determines that public necessity and convenience will be served thereby, it may cooperate with the petitioning county or counties, in any manner agreeable to all parties, for the purpose of procuring preliminary estimates of the cost of the proposed project. After such preliminary estimates are made and submitted to it, the department may enter into an agreement with any petitioner or with the several petitioners for the purpose of securing detailed surveys, plans, specifications, and estimates of the cost of the proposed project.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

793.

All such surveys, plans, specifications, and estimates of cost shall be subject to the approval of the department. Upon such approval, a copy of the petition and approved documents shall be filed with the department, and with the clerk of the board of supervisors and the county recorder of each petitioning county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

794.

Upon such approval the department may enter into a written agreement with any petitioner or with the several petitioners for the improvement or construction of the highway in question. The cost of such improvement or construction shall be prorated between the contracting parties in any agreed proportion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

795.

If the proposed construction or improvement lies wholly within one county, the board of supervisors of the county may designate the county surveyor or any engineer to take charge of the work. If two or more counties are petitioners they shall agree as to the engineer or county surveyor who will take charge of the work and after so agreeing they shall notify the department that they are ready to proceed with the work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

796.

When a written agreement has been entered into as provided in section 794, detailed plans and specifications shall be prepared by the engineer or surveyor named to take charge of the proposed construction or improvement and shall be submitted to the department for its approval. If such plans and specifications meet with the approval of the department it shall so notify the petitioning board or boards of supervisors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

797.

The board shall then proceed to advertise for bids and let the contract for the improvement or construction of such highway after first securing the department’s written approval of the proposal submitted by the successful bidder. If the bids for improving or constructing such highway exceed a figure which the department considers reasonable, such bids shall be rejected. In such case the project may be readvertised and if, upon such readvertisement, no satisfactory bid is received the work proposed may, subject to the approval and under the inspection of the department, be undertaken by day labor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

798.

Payment for the work done under this article shall be made in the manner provided by law for the payment of claims against counties. Upon satisfactory evidence being presented to the department that the work done conforms to its requirements, the department shall pay, in the manner provided by law, its pro rata share of the cost of the work as agreed upon. Such payment shall be made out of any funds available to the department for such purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Advance Mitigation Program [800. - 800.9.]

800.

(a) The Advance Mitigation Program is hereby created in the department to enhance communications between the department and stakeholders to protect natural resources through project mitigation, to meet or exceed applicable environmental requirements, to accelerate project delivery, and to mitigate, to the maximum extent required by law, environmental impacts from transportation infrastructure projects. The department shall consult on all activities pursuant to this article with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, including activities pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code.

(b) Commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year, and for a period of four years, the department shall set aside no less than thirty million dollars
 ($30,000,000) annually for the Advance Mitigation Program from the annual appropriations for the State Highway Operation and Protection Program and the State Transportation Improvement Program for the planning and implementation of projects in the Advance Mitigation Program. Mitigation credits or values generated or obtained with these funds may be used only for transportation improvements in the State Transportation Improvement Program or the State Highway Operation and Protection Program, and may be transferred to another agency, but only upon full reimbursement of the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 800.6.

(c) Upon the order of the Director of Finance, the Controller shall transfer the amount identified for the Advance Mitigation Program in subdivision (b), as determined by the department and the Department of Finance, to the Advance Mitigation Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(d) The annual Budget Act and subsequent legislation may establish additional provisions and requirements for the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 95, Sec. 10.   (SB 103)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

800.5.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Acquire” and “acquisition” mean, with respect to land or a waterway, acquisition of fee title or purchase of a conservation easement that protects conservation and mitigation values on the land or waterway in perpetuity.

(b) “Administrative draft natural community conservation plan” means a substantially complete draft of a natural community conservation plan that is released after January 1, 2016, to the general public, plan participants, and the department.

(c) “Advance mitigation” means mitigation implemented before, and in anticipation of, environmental
 effects of planned transportation improvements.

(d) “Commission” means the California Transportation Commission.

(e) “Conservation easement” means a perpetual conservation easement that complies with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 815) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code.

(f) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(g) “Mitigation credit agreement” means a mitigation credit agreement pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code.

(h) “Natural Communities Conservation Plan” means a plan developed pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(i) “Planned transportation improvement” means a transportation project that a transportation agency has identified in a regional transportation plan, an interregional transportation plan, a capital improvement program, or other approved transportation planning document, excluding any project that is associated with or interacting with the high-speed rail program. A planned transportation improvement may include, but is not limited to, a transportation project that has been planned, programmed, proposed for approval, or that has been approved.

(j) “Program” means the Advance Mitigation Program implemented pursuant to this article.

(k) “Regional conservation investment strategy” means a regional conservation investment strategy approved by the Department of Fish and Wildlife pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section
 1850) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code.

(l) “Regulatory agency” means a state or federal natural resource protection agency with regulatory authority over planned transportation improvements. A regulatory agency includes, but is not limited to, the Natural Resources Agency, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, California regional water quality control boards, the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, the National Marine Fisheries Service, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and the United States Army Corps of Engineers. 

(m) “Transportation agency” means the department, a metropolitan planning organization, a regional transportation planning agency, or another public agency that implements transportation improvements.

(n) “Transportation improvement” means a transportation capital improvement
 project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 95, Sec. 11.   (SB 103)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

800.6.

(a) The funds in the Advance Mitigation Account created in Section 800.7 shall be used only to do the following:

(1) Purchase, or fund the purchase of, credits from mitigation banks, conservation banks, or in-lieu fee programs approved by one or more regulatory agencies. The department may also establish mitigation banks, conservation banks, or in-lieu fee programs, or fund the establishment of mitigation banks, conservation banks, or in-lieu fee programs, in accordance with applicable state and federal standards, if the department determines that those banks or in-lieu fee programs would provide appropriate mitigation of the anticipated potential impacts of planned transportation improvements
 identified pursuant to Section 800.8.

(2) Pay, or fund the payment of, mitigation fees or other costs or payments associated with coverage for the department’s or other transportation agency’s projects under natural community conservation plans approved pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code, or habitat conservation plans approved in accordance with the federal Endangered Species Act. The department shall, upon commencement of a regional conservation investment strategy pursuant to paragraph (3), provide written notification thereof to the executive administrative officer of any administrative draft natural community conservation plan, approved natural community conservation plan, or approved regional federal habitat conservation plan that overlaps the proposed area of the regional
 conservation investment strategy.

(3) Prepare, or fund the preparation of, regional conservation assessments and regional conservation investment strategies. Where a regional conservation investment strategy has been approved by the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the department may do either of the following:

(A) Enter into, or fund the preparation of, mitigation credit agreements with the Department of Fish and Wildlife; purchase credits from an established mitigation credit agreement; or implement, or fund the implementation of, conservation actions and habitat enhancement actions as needed to generate mitigation credits pursuant to those mitigation credit agreements.

(B) Acquire, restore, manage, monitor,
 enhance, and preserve lands, waterways, aquatic resources, or fisheries, or fund the acquisition, restoration, management, monitoring, enhancement, and preservation of lands, waterways, aquatic resources, or fisheries that would measurably advance a conservation objective in the regional conservation investment strategy if the department concludes that the action or actions could conserve or create environmental values that are appropriate to mitigate the anticipated potential impacts of planned transportation improvements.

(4) Where the advance mitigation mechanisms in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, are not practicable, the department may implement advance mitigation, or fund the implementation of advance mitigation, in accordance with a programmatic mitigation plan pursuant to Section 800.9. No more than 25 percent of the funds in
 the Advance Mitigation Account may be allocated for this purpose over a four-year period.

(b) The department may use, or allow other transportation agencies to use, mitigation credits or values generated or obtained under the program to fulfill the mitigation requirements of planned
 transportation improvements if the applicable transportation agency reimburses the program for all costs of purchasing or creating the mitigation credits or values, as determined by the department. Those costs shall be calculated using total cost accounting and shall include, as applicable, land acquisition or conservation easement costs, monitoring and enforcement costs, restoration costs, transaction costs, administrative costs, contingency costs, and land management, monitoring, and protection costs.

(c) The department shall track all implemented advance mitigation projects to use as credits for environmental mitigation.

(d) Projects or plans prepared pursuant to this section that overlap with any approved natural community conservation plan or approved regional
 federal habitat conservation plan, shall be consistent with that plan and shall include an explanation of whether and to what extent they are consistent with any overlapping state or federal recovery plan, or other state-approved or federal-approved conservation strategy.

(e) Mitigation credits created pursuant to this section may be used for covered activities under an approved natural community conservation plan only in accordance with the requirements of the plan. Individuals and entities eligible for coverage as a participating special entity under an approved natural community conservation plan may use mitigation credits created pursuant to this section only if the plan’s implementing entity declines to extend coverage to the covered activity proposed by the eligible individual or entity.

(f) By July 1, 2019, and biennially thereafter, the department, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, shall submit to the Legislature a report that describes to what extent the Advance Mitigation Program has accelerated the delivery of transportation projects. At a minimum, the report shall include the following:

(1) An accounting of the Advance Mitigation Account funds.

(2) Identification of expected state and federal resource and regulatory agency mitigation requirements for transportation projects utilizing the Advance Mitigation Program.

(3) A discussion of the extent that those requirements are satisfied using advance mitigation credits.

(4) The use of funds to prepare, or to fund the preparation of, regional conservation assessments and regional conservation investment strategies.

(5) Recommendations for maximizing the ability of the Advance Mitigation Program to satisfy state and federal mitigation requirements.

(g) By July 1, 2018, or one year after the initial Advance Mitigation Program investments have begun, whichever is earlier, and biennially thereafter, the Department of Fish and Wildlife shall, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, submit a report to the Legislature that describes the extent to which the Advance Mitigation Program has improved the quality and effectiveness
 of habitat mitigation provided by the department for transportation projects and makes related recommendations on how to maximize these attributes. The report shall also include recommendations on how to maximize the quality and effectiveness of habitat mitigation developed pursuant to the Advance Mitigation Program.

(h) Nothing in this article shall be construed to impose any restrictions or requirements on the department for activities that do not involve the utilization of Advance Mitigation Account funds. Nothing in this article shall be construed to require the department to use the Advance Mitigation Program.
